Maine, session 132, LD1873.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 239 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 239
AGE VERIFICATION FOR ONLINE MATERIAL
§1500-Y. Age verification for online obscene matter
1. Age verification required. A business entity that knowingly and intentionally
publishes or distributes obscene matter, as defined in Title 17, section 2911, subsection 1,
paragraph D, on a website or software application shall verify that an individual attempting
to access the obscene matter is 18 years of age or older through reasonable age verification
methods, including, but not limited to, providing a valid, government-issued identification
or through methods that rely on public or private transactional data to verify the age of the
individual attempting to access the obscene matter. The business entity shall prevent access
to the obscene matter by an individual who has not attained 18 years of age. A business
entity that performs an age verification required pursuant to this subsection may not retain
any identifying information of the individual after the individual's age has been verified.
For the purposes of this chapter, "business entity" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A,
section 1402, subsection 3-A.
2. Exceptions. This section does not apply to any bona fide news broadcast or public
interest broadcast, video, report or event and does not affect the rights of a news
organization.
An Internet service provider, as defined in Title 5, section 200-B, subsection 1-A,
paragraph A, or an Internet service provider's affiliates or subsidiaries, a search engine or
a provider of so-called cloud hosting services does not violate this section solely for
providing access or connection to or from a website or other information or content on the
Internet or on a facility, system or network not under the Internet service provider's,
affiliate's, subsidiary's, search engine's or provider's control, including by transmission or
downloading, or through intermediate storage or access software, to the extent the Internet
service provider, affiliate, subsidiary, search engine or provider is not responsible for the
creation of the obscene matter.
3. Violation; liability. A business entity that is found to have violated subsection 1 is
liable to an individual for damages resulting from a minor's accessing the obscene matter,
including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees. A business entity that is found to have
knowingly retained identifying information of an individual after the individual's age has
been verified is liable to the individual for damages resulting from retaining the identifying
information, including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
If the Attorney General has reason to believe that a business entity is in violation of this
section, the Attorney General may bring an action against the business entity for an unfair
or deceptive act or practice as prohibited under Title 5, section 207.
4. Rules. The Attorney General shall adopt rules for the administration and
implementation of this chapter, including procedures for receiving and investigating
Page 1 - 132LR1231(01)

411 complaints of violations, and shall establish penalties for violations. Rules adopted
422 pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
433 subchapter 2-A.